Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 77.2 District Charter School
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-77.2-1.
Entities eligible to apply to become district charter schools.

Persons or entities eligible to submit an application to establish a district charter school shall be limited to:

Existing public schools;

Groups of public school personnel;

Public school districts; or

A group of school districts.

No existing public school shall be converted into a district charter school unless a majority of the parents and/or guardians of the students currently assigned to the school and two- thirds (2/3) of the certified teaching personnel currently assigned to the school approve the proposed charter, as provided in §

16-77.2-2

.

School professionals employed by a local or regional school committee or the State of Rhode Island shall be entitled to a two (2) year leave of absence, without compensation, in order to be employed in a district charter school, provided this leave shall be extended upon request for an additional two (2) years. At any time during or upon completion of this leave of absence, a school professional may return to work in the school district in the position in which he or she was previously employed or a comparable position. This leave of absence shall not be deemed to be an interruption of service for purposes of seniority and teachers’ retirement.

No child shall be required to attend a district charter school nor shall any teacher be required to teach in a district charter school. The school committee shall make accommodations to facilitate the transfer of students who do not wish to participate in the district charter school into other public schools. It shall also make accommodations for those students who wish to participate to transfer into the district charter school as space permits. If the total number of students who are eligible to attend and apply to a district charter school is greater than the number of spaces available, the charter school shall conduct a lottery to determine which students shall be admitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-2.
Procedure for creation of district charter schools.

Any persons or entities eligible to establish a district charter school may submit a proposed charter to the commissioner and the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located. The proposed charter shall:

Be submitted to the commissioner and to the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located no later than December 1st of the school year before the school year in which the district charter school is to be established;

Describe a plan for education, including the mission, objective, method of providing a basic education, measurable student academic goals that the district charter school will meet, and process for improving student learning and fulfilling the charter and fulfilling state and national educational goals and standards;

Provide a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days of instruction to students per year;

Indicate performance criteria that will be used to measure student learning and to comply with the charter, state, and national educational goals and standards;

Include an agreement to provide a yearly report to parents, the community, the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located, and the commissioner, which indicates the progress made by the district charter school during the previous year in meeting the charter objectives;

Present a plan for the governance, administration, and operation of the district charter school, including the manner in which the governing board of the school will be chosen, the nature and extent of parental, professional educator, and community involvement in the governance and operation of the district charter school, and the means of ensuring accountability to the commissioner, the school district of the district where the district charter school is to be located, and the board of regents;

Identify the building that will house the district charter school and from whom and under what terms and conditions it is to be provided;

Describe what support services will be provided by the school district and under what terms and conditions those services are to be provided, and describe what support services the district charter school will obtain directly from third-parties and, to the extent known, under what terms and conditions those services are to be provided;

Explain the procedures that will be followed to ensure the health and safety of pupils and staff;

Describe enrollment procedures including the permissible criteria for admission in accordance with applicable state and federal law, along with a policy or policies that outline outreach and recruitment programs to encourage the enrollment of a diverse student population;

Explain the student discipline procedures;

Explain the relationship that will exist between the proposed district charter school and its employees, including the terms and conditions of employment and the qualifications that the employees must meet. Teachers and administrators in district charter schools must be certified pursuant to state law and regulation. Teachers and administrators in district charter schools shall be entitled to prevailing wages and benefits as enjoyed by other public school teachers and administrators within the school district where the district charter school is to be located and to the state teachers’ retirement system under chapter 8 of title 36. Employment in a district charter school shall be considered “service” as that term is defined in chapter 16 of this title. All employees and prospective employees of a district charter school shall be deemed to be public school employees, having the same rights, including retirement, under Rhode Island and federal law as employees and prospective employees at a non-chartered public school.

Identify with particularity the state statutes, state regulations, and school district rules from which variances are sought in order to facilitate operation of the district charter school. Explain the reasons for each variance and the alternative method by which the concern that gave rise to the regulation or provision will be addressed;

The proposed charter shall set forth those provisions of the collective bargaining agreement which will not be applicable to that district charter school subject to agreement by the parties to the collectively bargaining agreement;

Provide a financial plan including a proposed budget for the term of the charter, and an annual audit of the financial and administrative operations of the district charter school, and the manner in which the funds allocated to the district charter school will be managed and disbursed;

Provide procedures by which teaching personnel and parents can legally challenge decisions of the governing board of the school which do not conform to the school’s charter; and

Provide a copy of the proposed bylaws of the district charter school.

In those instances where a charter is being sought for an existing public school, the proposed charter must receive the affirmative votes of two-thirds (2/3) of the teachers assigned to the school prior to implementation. If approved by the faculty, the proposed charter shall be voted on by the parents or legal guardians of each student assigned to the school, with one vote being cast for each student. To be adopted by the parents, the proposed charter must receive the affirmative votes of parents or legal guardians representing a majority of all the students assigned to the school.

In those instances where a charter is being sought for a newly created district charter school, the proposed charter must receive the affirmative support of a number of certified teachers employed within the school district where the district charter school is to be located at least equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the number of teachers that will be required to staff the proposed district charter school. The teachers who affirmatively support the proposed charter must state their desire to transfer to the district charter school, once established, and to teach under the terms of the charter. To demonstrate parental support within the school district, the charter must receive the affirmative support of parents or legal guardians representing a number of students currently enrolled in the school district equal to at least one-half (1/2) of the number of students who would be needed to attend the proposed district charter school. The parents or guardians must state their desire to have their children transfer to the district charter school, once established, and to be educated under the terms of the charter. The charter may then be presented by the commissioner to the board of regents for its approval. The charter shall set forth those provisions of state statute, regulation, and school district rules which will not be applicable to that district charter school

By approval of the charter upon the recommendation of the commissioner, the board of regents will be deemed to have authorized all necessary variances from law and regulation enumerated in the charter. Should the need for relief from the operation of additional provisions of law and/or contract become apparent subsequent to implementation of the charter, a variance may be obtained by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the teachers then assigned to the school, agreement by all parties to the collective bargaining agreement and by an affirmative vote of the board of regents upon a recommendation of the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-3.
Process for consideration of proposed charter.

If the commissioner or the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located finds the proposed charter to be incomplete, further information may be requested and required. The commissioner shall develop regulations for amending an approved charter, consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

After having received a satisfactory proposed charter, the commissioner will provide for a public comment period of not less than sixty (60) days, during which they will hold at least two (2) public hearings on the proposed charter. These hearings will be held in the district where the proposed district charter school is to be located. Any person may file with the committee and/or the commissioner comments, recommendations, and/or objections relevant to the granting of a charter.

A copy of the proposed charter for a district charter school at an existing public school shall be provided to the collective bargaining agent for the teachers in the school district where the district charter school is to be located at the time that it is filed with the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located and the commissioner. The teachers through their collective bargaining agent shall be afforded the opportunity to present their analysis of and recommendations regarding the proposed charter to the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located and the board of regents prior to any determination by those entities. If the teachers’ union objects to the proposed charter or to any provision of it, it shall set forth the reasons for those objections in detail. These objections and recommendations shall be considered and responded to by the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located and the commissioner before making any recommendation to the board of regents, and by the board of regents prior to its determination.

The commissioner or the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located will each decide on whether or not to recommend the granting of the charter to the board of regents within ninety (90) days after the conclusion of the public comment period.

The commissioner or the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located may recommend to the board of regents granting of a revocable charter for a district charter school upon receiving a proposed charter.

If the commissioner or the school committee of the district where the district charter school is to be located recommends the granting of the proposed charter, the matter shall be referred to the board of regents for a decision on whether to grant a charter. The board of regents may grant a charter for a period of up to five (5) years. The decision of the board of regents, complete with reasons and conditions, shall be made available to the public and to the applicant. Charter public school approval for establishment or continuation shall be for up to a five (5) year period. At the conclusion of each five (5) year period, the board of regents may conduct a subsequent review of the district charter school’s charter. If the board of regents does not conduct such a review, the charter shall renew for another five (5) year period. The commissioner, with approval of the board of regents, shall promulgate rules and regulations for these five (5) year reviews.

The commissioner, with the approval of the board of regents, may grant a variance to any provision of title 16 other than those enumerated in section 16-77.1, and to any department of education regulation and to any school district regulation which does not affect the health and safety or civil rights of pupils in district charter schools.

All proposed charters shall be matters of public record and will be provided to members of the public upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-4.
Revocation of the charter of a district charter school.

The board of regents may revoke the charter of a district charter school at any time, pursuant to §

16-77-5.1

, if the school:

Materially violates any of the provisions contained in the charter;

Fails to meet or pursue the educational objectives contained in the charter;

Fails to comply with fiscal accountability procedures as specified in the charter;

Violates provisions of law that have not been granted variance by the board of regents; or

After three (3) consecutive years of operation, is not a “high-performing charter school,” defined as a charter public school that has demonstrated overall success, including: (i) Substantial progress in improving student achievement and (ii) The management and leadership necessary to establish a thriving, financially viable charter public school.

After denying or prior to non-renewing or revoking a charter, the department of elementary and secondary education will hold a hearing on the issues in controversy under §

16-39-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-5.
Budgets and funding.

It is the intent of the general assembly that funding pursuant to this chapter shall be neither a financial incentive nor a financial disincentive to the establishment of a district charter school. Funding for each district charter school shall consist of state revenue and municipal or district revenue in the same proportions that funding is provided for other schools within the sending school district(s).

Funding additional to that authorized from the sending school district(s) may be allocated to the district charter school from the sending school district(s) to the extent that the combined percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-cost lunch, students with limited English proficiency, and students requiring special education exceed the combined percentage of those students in the sending school district(s) as a whole. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this section regarding the allocation of funds from sending school districts to district charter schools.

All services, centrally or otherwise provided by the school district in which the district charter school is located, that the district charter school decides to utilize including, but not limited to, transportation, food services, custodial services, maintenance, curriculum, media services, libraries, nursing, and warehousing, shall be subject to negotiation between a district charter school and the school district in which the district charter school is located and paid for out of the revenues of the district charter school. Disputes with regard to cost of services requested from the school district in which the district charter school is located will be adjudicated by the commissioner.

A district charter school shall be eligible to receive other aids, grants, Medicaid revenue, and other revenue according to Rhode Island law, as though it were a school district. Federal aid received by the state shall be used to benefit students in the charter public school, if the school qualifies for the aid, as though it were a school district.

A district charter school may negotiate and contract directly with third parties for the purchase of books, instructional materials, and any other goods and services that are not being provided by the sending school district(s) pursuant to the charter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 3.

16-77.2-6.
Applicability of other provisions of title 16.

The board of regents may grant to district charter schools variances of specific chapters and sections of this title except to the extent that these chapters and sections are enumerated in §

16-77.2-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-7.
Portions of title 16 applicable to district charter schools.

The following provisions of this title shall be binding on district charter schools and may not be waived by the commissioner under §

16-77.2-3

:

Section 16-2-2 (minimum length of school year);

Section 16-2-17 (right to a safe school);

Section 16-8-10 (federal funds for school lunch);

Section 16-11-1 (certification of public school teachers);

Section 16-12-3 (duty to cultivate principles of morality);

Section 16-12-10 (immunity for report of suspected substance abuse);

Chapter 13 (teachers’ tenure);

Chapter 16 (teachers’ retirement);

Section 16-19-1 (compulsory attendance);

Section 16-20-1 (school holidays enumerated);

Sections

16-21-3

and 16-21-4 (fire safety);

Sections

16-21-10

,

16-21-14

, and 16-21-16 (health screenings);

Section 16-22-9 (uniform testing);

Section 16-24-2 (regulations of state board);

Section 16-38-1 (discrimination because of race or age);

Section 16-38-1.1 (discrimination because of sex);

Section 16-38-2 (immunizations);

Section 16-38-4 (exclusive club);

Section 16-38-6 (commercial activities prohibited);

Section 16-38-9 (misconduct of school officers);

Section 16-38-10 (power of officials to visit schools);

Section 16-39-1 (appeal of matters of dispute to commissioner);

Section 16-39-2 (appeal of school committee actions to commissioner);

Section 16-39-3 (appeal to state board);

Section 16-39-3.1 (enforcement of final decision);

Section 16-39-3.2 (interim protective orders);

Section 16-39-8 (subpoena power of commissioner);

Section 16-40-16 (student records);

Section 16-71-1 (Educational Record Bill of Rights Act).

Chapter

16-21-21.1

(Penalties for drug, alcohol or weapons offenses);

Chapter 16-21.5 (Student interrogations).

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.

16-77.2-8.
Charter school reporting.

All district charter schools shall continuously monitor their financial operations by tracking actual versus budgeted revenue and expense. The chief financial officer of the district charter school shall submit a report on a quarterly basis to the state office of municipal affairs certifying the status of the district charter school budget.

The quarterly reports shall be in a format prescribed by the state office of municipal affairs and the state auditor general. The reports shall contain a statement as to whether any actual or projected shortfalls in budget line items are expected to result in a year-end deficit, the projected impact on year-end financial results including all accruals and encumbrances, and how the district charter school plans to address any such shortfalls. The auditor general or the state director of administration may petition the superior court to order the district charter school to file said reports. The director of administration may also direct the state controller and general treasurer to withhold any funding to the district charter school until the school complies with the reporting requirements hereunder. Failure to comply with this section shall be cause for the revocation of the school charter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 4.